Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 25 Size, Weight, and Load Limits

31-25-1.
Compliance with chapter required.

Except in reference to §§

31-25-16

and

31-25-27

where it shall be considered a violation, it is a civil violation for any carrier to drive or move or to cause or permit to be driven or moved on any highway any vehicle or vehicles of a size or weight exceeding the limitations stated in this chapter or otherwise in violation of this chapter, and the maximum size and weight of vehicles specified in this chapter shall be lawful throughout this state. Local authorities shall have no power or authority to alter the limitations except as express authority may be granted in this chapter.

“Carrier” includes any company or person who furthers their commercial or private enterprise by use of the vehicle.

The director of the department of transportation shall promulgate rules and regulations and requirements consistent with this chapter for the application and issuance of permits for overweight and oversize vehicles or loads.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 35, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-25-1

; P.L. 1985, ch. 277, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 437, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 412, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 6, § 13; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 22; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 22.

31-25-2.
Vehicles exempt from limitations.

The provisions of this chapter governing size, weight, and load shall not apply to:

Road machinery;

Farm vehicles, including farm tractors, temporarily moved upon a highway;

Any vehicle owned and operated by the Rhode Island public transit authority that is designed for carrying passengers and is comprised of two (2) sections permanently joined by a hinge mechanism or an articulated joint that allows vertical and horizontal movement and a passage for riders moving from one section to the other;

A vehicle operated under the terms of a special permit issued as provided in this chapter;

Covered heavy-duty tow and recovery vehicles;

Emergency vehicles with a weight limit of up to a maximum gross vehicle weight of eighty-six thousand pounds (86,000 lbs.) or less than twenty-four thousand pounds (24,000 lbs.) on a single steering axle; thirty-three thousand five hundred pounds (33,500 lbs.) on a single-drive axle; sixty-two thousand pounds (62,000 lbs.) on a tandem axle; or fifty-two thousand pounds (52,000 lbs.) on a tandem rear drive steer axle; or

Natural gas vehicles up to a maximum gross vehicle weight of eighty-two thousand pounds (82,000 lbs.) by an amount that is equal to the difference between the weight of the vehicle attributable to the natural gas tank and fueling system carried by that vehicle; and the weight of a comparable diesel tank and fueling system.

The provisions of this chapter governing size, weight, and load shall not apply to fire apparatus acquired by a city or town within this state prior to July 1, 1999.

Nothing in this section shall permit these vehicles to travel over any structure, highway, or portion of highway that is weight restricted for the vehicle load.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 35, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-25-2

; P.L. 1983, ch. 236, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 209, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 39, § 2; P.L. 2018, ch. 45, § 2; P.L. 2022, ch. 178, § 1, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 179, § 1, effective June 27, 2022.

31-25-3.
Maximum width.

The total outside width of any vehicle or the load on it shall not exceed one hundred two inches (102") excluding any safety and noncargo carrying appurtenances on either motorized campers or camping recreational vehicles.

Any carrier or persons operating a vehicle that exceeds the maximum width, as permitted or as defined in this section, shall be fined one hundred dollars ($100) per inch over width or portion of it.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 35, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-25-3

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 122; P.L. 2004, ch. 308, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 380, § 2; P.L. 2022, ch. 178, § 1, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 179, § 1, effective June 27, 2022.

31-25-4.
Maximum height.

No vehicle including any load on it shall exceed a height of one hundred sixty-two inches (162").

Any carrier or persons operating a vehicle that exceeds the maximum height, as permitted or as defined in this section, shall be fined five hundred dollars ($500) per inch over height or portion of it.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 35, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

31-25-4

; P.L. 1965, ch. 52, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 122; P.L. 2022, ch. 178, § 1, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 179, § 1, effective June 27, 2022.

31-25-5.
Maximum length of single vehicle and load.

No vehicle, including any load on it, except Rhode Island public transit authority articulated buses, shall exceed a length of forty feet (40´) extreme overall dimension inclusive of front and rear bumpers, or in the case of a motor bus, motorized camper or camping recreational vehicle forty-five feet (45´).

Any carrier or persons operating a vehicle that exceeds the maximum length, as permitted or as defined in this section, shall be fined two hundred dollars ($200) per foot over length or portion of it.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 35, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

31-25-5

; P.L. 1983, ch. 213, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 500, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 308, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 380, § 2; P.L. 2022, ch. 178, § 1, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 179, § 1, effective June 27, 2022.

31-25-6.
Maximum number and length of coupled vehicles.

No combination of vehicles coupled together shall consist of more than three (3) units, a truck-tractor, semi-trailer, and trailer. The combination of vehicles shall not be restricted in overall length, except that when a truck-tractor, semi-trailer, and a trailer are used in combination, the trailer or semi-trailer each shall not exceed twenty-eight and one-half feet (28´ 6"), excluding bumpers and accessories. Provided, however, that combinations of vehicles consisting of three (3) units shall be permitted to operate only on the interstate highway system and on those highways, streets, and roads designated by the director of the department of transportation.

Combinations of vehicles consisting of truck-tractor and semi-trailer coupled together shall not be restricted in overall length, and semi-trailers shall not exceed fifty-three feet (53´) in length, excluding bumpers and accessories. Towaway trailer transporter combinations shall not be restricted to an overall length limitation of less than eighty-two feet (82´). Semi-trailers exceeding forty-eight and one-half feet (48´ 6") shall be permitted to operate only on the interstate highway system and on those highways, streets, and roads designated by the director of the department of transportation. Exceptions to the requirements of this section include the use of a pole trailer and combinations designed to transport motor vehicles and/or automobiles as authorized in §§

31-25-7

and

31-25-8

. The provision that no combination of vehicles coupled together shall consist of more than three (3) units shall not apply to vehicles coupled together by a saddle mount device used to transport motor vehicles in a drive-away service when no more than three (3) saddle mounts are used, and equipment used in the combination is approved by Part 393.71 of the federal motor carrier safety regulations, 49 C.F.R. § 393.71, and safety regulations of the division of motor vehicles of the department of revenue of the state of Rhode Island as this federal and/or state legislation may be amended or revised from time to time. Any owner or operator found deviating from the approved permitted routes shall be fined a minimum mandatory fine of five hundred dollars ($500), but not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

The distance from the kingpin of the trailer to the center of the rear axle may not exceed forty-one feet (41´).

Fifty-three foot (53´) trailers shall be equipped with a rear-end protection device of substantial construction consisting of a continuous lateral beam extending to within four inches (4") of the lateral extremities of the trailer, and located not more than twenty-two inches (22") from the surface of the road as measured with the vehicle empty and on level surface.

Any carrier or persons operating a vehicle or combination of vehicles that exceeds the maximum number or length of coupled vehicles, as permitted or as defined in this section, shall be fined two hundred dollars ($200) per foot over length or portion of it.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 35, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

31-25-6

; P.L. 1965, ch. 52, § 2; P.L. 1981, ch. 27, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 213, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 391, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 127, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 86; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 122; P.L. 2005, ch. 77, § 6; P.L. 2005, ch. 82, § 6; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 22; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 22; P.L. 2018, ch. 39, § 2; P.L. 2018, ch. 45, § 2; P.L. 2022, ch. 178, § 1, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 179, § 1, effective June 27, 2022.

31-25-7.
Front and rear extensions of load.

Subject to the provisions of this chapter limiting the length of vehicles and loads, the load upon any vehicle, operated alone or the load upon the front vehicle of a combination of vehicles, shall not extend more than three feet (3´) beyond the foremost part of the vehicle, and the load upon any vehicle, operated alone or the load upon the rear vehicle of a combination of vehicles, shall not extend more than six feet (6´) beyond the rear of the bed or body of the vehicle.

Any carrier or persons operating a vehicle that exceeds the maximum extensions of load, as permitted or as defined in this section, shall be fined two hundred dollars ($200) per foot over length or portion of it.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 35, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

31-25-7

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 122; P.L. 2022, ch. 178, § 1, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 179, § 1, effective June 27, 2022.

31-25-8.
Pole trailers.

The limitations as to the length of vehicles and loads stated in §§

31-25-5

and

31-25-6

shall not apply to any load upon a pole trailer as defined in §

31-1-5

when transporting poles or pipes or structural material which cannot be dismembered, provided that no pole or pipe or other material exceeding eighty feet (80´) in length shall be so transported unless a permit has first been obtained as authorized in §

31-25-21

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 35, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

31-25-8

.

31-25-9.
Prevention of leakage of load.

No vehicles shall be driven or moved on any highway unless the vehicle is so constructed or loaded as to prevent any of its load from dropping, sifting, leaking, or otherwise escaping from it. However, sand may be dropped for the purpose of securing traction, or water or another substance may be sprinkled on a roadway in cleaning or maintaining the roadway. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 35, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

31-25-9

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 122.

31-25-10.
Fastening of load and covering.

No person shall operate on any highway any vehicle with any load unless the load and any covering on it is securely fastened so as to prevent the covering or load from becoming loose, detached, or in any manner a hazard to other users of the highway.

No motor truck trailer or semitrailer which is used for the purpose of hauling logs, pulpwood, lumber, or other materials which by their very nature may shift or roll so as to be likely to fall from the vehicle, shall be operated or moved over any highway unless its load is securely fastened to the vehicle by chains, cables, or other approved devices as will effectively prevent the shifting of the load or any part of it falling from the vehicle. The ends of the chains, cables, or other devices and any tire chains shall be tied securely, whether the vehicle is loaded or unloaded, so that loose ends shall not endanger pedestrians or other vehicles encountered on the highway.

This section shall not be construed to include a truck transporting lumber, wood, or sawmill wastes, when transported in a box type body with solid sides, provided that the truck is not loaded higher than its side-boards.

A person who violates the provisions of this section shall be fined:

Not more than one hundred dollars ($100) for the first violation; and

Not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) for any subsequent violations.

No person shall operate a motor truck or other vehicle carrying or transporting any rubbish, refuse, or other debris on any highway without first securely fastening a covering on it to prevent the contents from falling to the highway. No person shall operate on any highway any vehicle with any load unless the load and any covering on it is securely fastened so as to prevent that covering or load from becoming loose, detached, or in any manner a hazard to other users of the highway.

No person shall operate an open motor truck or other similar vehicle while carrying or transporting any child under sixteen (16) years of age without securely fastening the child to prevent them from becoming loose or detached in any manner.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 35, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

31-25-10

; P.L. 1966, ch. 270, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 119, § 1; P.L. 1974, ch. 31, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 17, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 271, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 410, § 1.

31-25-11.
Connections between coupled vehicles.

When one vehicle is towing another the drawbar or other connection shall be of sufficient strength to pull all weight towed by it and the drawbar or other connection shall not exceed fifteen feet (15´) from one vehicle to the other, except the connection between any two (2) vehicles transporting poles, pipe, machinery, or other objects of structural nature which cannot readily be dismembered. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 35, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

31-25-11

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 122.

31-25-12.
Flags on tow chains.

When one vehicle is towing another and the connection consists of a chain, rope, or cable, there shall be displayed upon the connection a white flag or cloth not less than twelve inches (12") square. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 35, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

31-25-12

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 122.

31-25-12.1.
Vehicles to be towed in right lane.

When a tow truck or other vehicle is towing another vehicle, except those vehicles designed to be in combination, in this state upon any public highway divided into two (2) or more clearly marked lanes for travel in the same direction, it shall be unlawful to tow except in the right lane of travel on a two (2) line highway, and in the two (2) right lanes of travel on a highway with three (3) or more lanes.

Any person who violates the provisions of this section shall, upon conviction, be fined in accordance with the penalties provided in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 231, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 348, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 122; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 12, § 11.

31-25-13.
Axle load limit.

The gross weight imposed on the highway by the wheels of any one axle of a vehicle shall not exceed twenty-two thousand four hundred pounds (22,400 lbs.).

For the purposes of this chapter, “axle load” is defined as the total load transmitted to the road by all wheels whose centers are included between two (2) parallel transverse vertical planes forty inches (40") apart, extending across the full width of the vehicle.

Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-25-14

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 35, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

31-25-13

; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 86; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 122; P.L. 2022, ch. 178, § 1, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 179, § 1, effective June 27, 2022.

31-25-14.
Maximum weight and tandem axles.

It shall be unlawful to transport or operate over or upon any public highway in this state any vehicle equipped with tandem axles, should the gross weight of the axles exceed thirty-six thousand pounds (36,000 lbs.) if the axle spacing does not exceed eight feet (8´).

With respect to all public highways, the overall gross weight on a group of two (2) or more consecutive axles of a vehicle or combination of vehicles, shall be determined by the following bridge gross weight formula:

W = 500 [(LN /(N-1)) + 12N + 36]

where W = the overall gross weight on any group of two or more consecutive axles to the nearest five hundred pounds (500 lbs.); L = the distance in feet between the extremes of any group of two (2) or more consecutive axles; and N = the number of axles in the group under consideration. This overall gross weight of any vehicle or combination of vehicles may not exceed eighty thousand pounds (80,000 lbs.) except as specified in §§

31-25-1

,

31-25-2

, and

31-25-21

.

In any calculation using the formula in subsection (b) of this section in which the tandem axle limit is less than thirty-six thousand pounds (36,000 lbs.), thirty-six thousand pounds (36,000 lbs.) shall be considered the legal limit. Single axle limits shall be as defined in §

31-25-13

. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to abrogate any of the “grandfather rights” in existence as of April 1, 1989.

Penalties.

Any carrier or persons operating a vehicle or combination of vehicles that exceeds the weight limits of tandem-axle vehicles, as defined in this section, shall be fined one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) per one hundred pounds (100 lbs.) overweight or portion of it.

Any carrier or persons operating a vehicle or combination of vehicles that exceeds the weight limits of twenty-two thousand four hundred pounds (22,400 lbs.) single axle limits as cited in §

31-25-13

, shall be fined one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) per one hundred pounds (100 lbs.) overweight or portion of it.

Any carrier or persons operating a vehicle or combination of vehicles that exceeds the bridge gross weight formula, as defined in this section, are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-25-16(c)(2)

through (c)(4).

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 35, § 8; P.L. 1950 (s.s.), ch. 2639, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

31-25-14

; P.L. 1984, ch. 429, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 195, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 170, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 345, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 86; P.L. 2002, ch. 58, § 5; P.L. 2022, ch. 178, § 1, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 179, § 1, effective June 27, 2022.

31-25-15.
Investigations as to safety of buses, trucks, and trailers.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles upon registering any truck, truck tractor, or semi-trailer under the laws of this state, or any bus for the transportation of ten (10) or more persons, may require any information and may make any investigation or test as necessary to enable him or her to determine whether the vehicle may safely be operated upon the highways in compliance with all the provisions of chapters 1 — 27 of this title. The administrator shall register the vehicle for a permissible gross weight not exceeding the limitations set forth in chapters 1 — 27 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 35, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

31-25-15

.

31-25-16.
Authorized weight shown in registration — Exceeding limit.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall insert in the registration card issued for a vehicle the gross weight for which it is registered. If it is a truck tractor to be used for propelling semi-trailers, he or she shall separately insert the total permissible gross weight of the truck tractor and semi-trailers to be propelled by it. It shall be unlawful for any carrier to operate or permit to be operated any vehicle or combination of vehicles of a gross weight in excess of that registered by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles, permitted by the department of transportation, or in excess of the limitations set forth in this chapter.

For the purposes of this chapter, “carrier” means and includes any company or person who furthers their commercial or private enterprise by use of the vehicle.

Penalties for violations of this section will be calculated on the legal weight in comparison to the actual weight and shall be heard and adjudicated at the traffic tribunal.

The overweight penalties for vehicles with ten thousand pounds (10,000 lbs.) gross vehicle weight or less shall be eighty-five dollars ($85.00) per thousand pounds overweight or portion of it.

The overweight penalties for vehicles exceeding ten thousand pounds (10,000 lbs.) gross vehicle weight shall be one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125.00) per five hundred pounds (500 lbs.) overweight or portion of it.

The overweight penalty for vehicles being operated in excess of one hundred four thousand, eight hundred pounds (104,800 lbs.) gross vehicle weight shall be one thousand twenty-five dollars ($1,025) in addition to the penalties enumerated in subsection (c)(3) of this section.

The overweight penalty for vehicles being operated in excess of one hundred thirty thousand pounds (130,000 lbs.) gross vehicle weight shall be two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) in addition to the penalties enumerated in subsection (c)(3) of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 35, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

31-25-16

; P.L. 1983, ch. 213, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 437, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 445, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 287, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 126, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 6, § 13; P.L. 2002, ch. 58, § 5; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 12, § 11; P.L. 2022, ch. 178, § 1, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 179, § 1, effective June 27, 2022.

31-25-17.
Identification of trucks and truck-tractors.

Every motor truck and every truck-tractor exceeding a gross vehicle weight or gross combination weight of ten thousand pounds (10,000 lbs.) shall be identified with the name, trade name, or company identifying logo and the city and state of the owner and operating carrier, or individual transporting property, when that transportation is for the furtherance of any commercial enterprise. However, in lieu of the city and state, one of the following may be displayed on the vehicle:

The interstate commerce commission number if a regulated interstate carrier; or

An identifying number issued by an official state agency.

The display of identification prescribed by this section shall be in letters in sharp color contrast to the background and be of such size, shape, and color as to be readily legible, during daylight hours, from a distance of fifty feet (50´) while the vehicle is not in motion. The display of identification may be accomplished through the use of a removable device so prepared as to otherwise meet the identification requirements and legibility requirements of this section, if the vehicle is operated by any company or carrier. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the display of additional identification as may be required by other laws of this state or any other state, or agency or department of the federal government.

Penalties for violations of this section shall be handled by the traffic tribunal and the fines shall be as provided for in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 161, § 2; P.L. 2002, ch. 58, § 5; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 12, § 11.

31-25-18.
Weighing of suspected overweight vehicles.

Any proper officer having reason to believe that the weight of a vehicle and load is unlawful is authorized to require the driver to stop and submit to a weighing of the vehicle and load by means of either portable or stationary scales, and may require that the vehicle be driven to the nearest available stationary scales. Any carrier or persons found to be operating in excess of their registered, permitted, and/or legal weight limits may be fined and released, required to reduce weight or dimensions to legal, and/or required to pursue a legal permit at the officer’s discretion. Any carrier or persons found to have pending motor vehicle fines in excess of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) may have their permit privileges suspended until pending fines are paid.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 35, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

31-25-18

; P.L. 2022, ch. 178, § 1, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 179, § 1, effective June 27, 2022.

31-25-19.
Removal of excess from overweight vehicles.

Whenever a proper officer upon weighing a vehicle and load, as provided in §

31-25-18

, determines that the weight is unlawful, the officer may require the driver to stop the vehicle in a suitable place and remain standing until the portion of the load is removed as may be necessary to reduce the gross weight of the vehicle to such a limit as permitted under this chapter. All material so unloaded shall be cared for by the owner or operator of the vehicle at the risk of the owner or operator.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 35, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

31-25-19

.

31-25-20.
Refusal to submit to weighing or removal of excess load.

Any driver of a vehicle who fails or refuses to stop and submit the vehicle and load to a weighing, or who fails or refuses when directed by a proper officer upon a weighing of the vehicle to stop the vehicle and otherwise comply with the provisions of §§

31-25-18

and

31-25-19

, shall, upon conviction, be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) and not more than two hundred-fifty dollars ($250).

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 35, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

31-25-20

; P.L. 1986, ch. 282, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 284, § 1.

31-25-21.
Power to permit excess size or weight of loads.

The department of transportation, with respect to highways under its jurisdiction, may, in its discretion, upon application in writing and good cause being shown for it, approve the issuance of a special permit in writing authorizing the applicant to operate or move a vehicle, or combination of vehicles, of a size or weight of vehicle or load exceeding eighty thousand pounds (80,000 lbs.) or otherwise not in conformity with the provisions of chapters 1 — 27 of this title upon any highway under the jurisdiction of the party granting the permit and for the maintenance of which the party is responsible. Permits that have been issued for a full year shall not be required to be renewed for the period of time for which payment has been made and the application and other required documentation has been completed and filed. Provided, that neither the department of transportation nor the local authorities may approve the issuance of permits for divisible loads weighing in excess of the limits set by the director of the department of transportation by and through the rules and regulations promulgated by the department of transportation entitled “rules and regulations regarding overweight and oversize vehicle permits”.

Provided, however, that for milk products, any vehicle carrying fluid milk products shall be considered a load that cannot be easily dismantled or divided.

The director of the department of transportation may enter into agreements with other states, the District of Columbia, and Canadian provinces providing for the reciprocal enforcement of the overweight or over-dimensional vehicle permit laws of those jurisdictions entering into the agreement.

Single trip non-divisible permit fee. A fee of forty dollars ($40.00) shall be paid to the department of transportation for the issuance of each non-divisible single trip permit. Upon approval of the application, the department of transportation shall provide the approved permit. The driver must possess the permit and documentation as required by the permit at all times.

Annual construction equipment blanket permit fee. An annual fee of four hundred dollars ($400) paid to the department of transportation shall exempt the payor from the necessity of paying single trip permit fees for non-divisible construction equipment loads of less than one hundred thirty thousand pounds (130,000 lbs.) as found in subsection (c). However, payment of the fee shall not be deemed to authorize noncompliance with the rules and regulations promulgated by the department of transportation entitled “rules and regulations regarding overweight and oversize vehicle permits”.

Blanket construction equipment permits may be issued, as determined by the department of transportation, for intrastate movement of non-divisible construction equipment loads upon payment of the fee set forth in subsection (d). If used in conjunction with an annual divisible load permit, the limits and requirements of the blanket construction equipment permit shall supersede the requirements of the divisible load permit. The driver must possess both permits and all required documentation. The duration of the blanket permit may not exceed one year. The construction equipment permit load shall be limited to a minimum overall length of fifty-five feet (55´), a maximum overall length of eighty feet (80´), a maximum width of twelve feet four inches (12´ 4"), a maximum gross weight of one hundred thirty thousand pounds (130,000 lbs.), and a maximum axle weight of twenty-five thousand pounds (25,000 lbs.); provided, that the department of transportation, with respect to highways under its jurisdiction, may, in its discretion and upon application and for good cause shown, approve the issuance of a single trip non-divisible permit authorizing the applicant to exceed one hundred thirty thousand pounds (130,000 lbs.) for non-divisible loads. A flashing amber light shall be in operation above the highest point of the vehicle and shall be visible from both the front and rear of the vehicle; and signs and red warning flags shall be affixed to all extremities. All blanket permits issued in accordance with this section shall be effective during daylight and night-time hours for all over-dimensional moves made and travel shall be allowed on state highways.

Permission to travel is always subject to weather and road conditions. The following restrictions on travel times shall apply to all vehicles over eight feet six inches (8´ 6") wide, over eighty feet (80´) long, or over one hundred thirty thousand pounds (130,000 lbs.):

Freeways and arterial roadways.

No travel will be allowed between the hours of 7:00 a.m. and 9:00 a.m. or between 3:00 p.m. and 7:00 p.m., Monday through Friday.

[Deleted by P.L. 2022, ch. 178, § 1 and P.L. 2022, ch. 179, § 1.]

Holidays.

Memorial Day, Victory Day, Labor Day, Dr. Martin Luther King Jr. Day, and Columbus Day — No Saturday, Sunday, or Monday day or night travel.

Thanksgiving Day — No travel on Wednesday through Sunday of Thanksgiving week in any calendar year.

Independence Day, Veterans Day, Christmas Day, New Year’s Day — No day or night travel and no travel the previous night.

Easter Sunday. No Saturday night or Sunday travel.

Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-25-24

.

Construction equipment blanket permits shall not be granted for travel over the following bridges:

Blackstone River Viaduct 750 carrying I-295 northbound and southbound over the Blackstone River;

Kingston Road Bridge No. 403 carrying I-95 northbound and southbound over Kingston Road.

Travel of blanket permitted construction equipment through zones with reductions in lane width such as construction zones will not be allowed. Prior to travel, blanket permit holders are responsible to verify the location of construction zones and lane width reductions. Locations of lane width reduction zones are available through the state department of transportation’s construction office.

Upon approval of the annual construction equipment blanket permit application, the department of transportation shall provide the approved permit. The driver must possess the permit and documentation as required by the permit at all times.

Any carrier or persons found to be operating without a required permit, or in excess of their permit limits, three (3) times within a one-year period shall be revoked of their ability to use and receive permits within the state for up to thirty (30) days. Additional violations shall result in revocation of up to ninety (90) days.

Operation of any vehicle in excess of the requirements of any permit shall void that permit and result in the imposition of fines as provided in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 35, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

31-25-21

; P.L. 1983, ch. 213, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 456, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 85, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 346, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 22; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 22; P.L. 2008, ch. 230, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 410, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 39, § 2; P.L. 2018, ch. 45, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 8, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 178, § 1, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 179, § 1, effective June 27, 2022.

31-25-22.
Application for excess load permit.

The application for an annual divisible load permit pursuant to §

31-25-21

shall specifically describe the vehicle or vehicles and load to be operated or moved, and the particular highways for which the permit to operate is requested.

For divisible load permits, the specifically described vehicle must be certified originally by the manufacturer to possess the braking and carrying capacity for the weight specified on the application.

Upon approval of the application or renewal of divisible load permits, the department of transportation shall provide the approved permit. The driver must possess the permit and documentation as required by the permit at all times.

[Deleted by P.L. 2022, ch. 178, § 1 and P.L. 2022, ch. 179, § 1.]

Divisible load permit fees for Rhode Island registered vehicles are reflected in the registration fee as enumerated in § 31-6-1(a)(2).

Divisible load permit fees for out-of-state registered vehicles are as follows:

Trailers $100 flat fee.

Single-unit axle trucks $50.00 per 1,000 pounds over legal limit; maximum $1,500.

Maximum permittable loads for single unit trucks:

Tractors $50.00 per 1,000 pounds over legal limit; maximum $1,250.

Tractors may acquire a permit for up to 104,800 lbs.; however the allowable gross weight depends on the total number of axles of the tractor/semi-trailer/trailer configuration being used at the time. Gross weight limits for tractor/semi-trailer/trailer configurations are as follows:

Transfer fee $10.00.

For the purpose of this section, the “legal limit” is defined as the maximum weight as calculated by the Bridge Formula.

Annual divisible load permits are issued for overweight only and not over-dimensional.

If the annual divisible load permit is used in conjunction with an annual construction equipment blanket permit, the limits and requirements of the blanket construction equipment permit shall supersede the requirements of the divisible load permit. The driver must possess both permits and all required documentation. This shall only apply when divisible load and trailered construction equipment are carried simultaneously.

Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-25-16

.

2 axle — legal weight only per , (c). §

31-25-14(b)

3+ axle — 76,650 lbs. Not to exceed Manufacturer GVWR.

Click to view

3 axle — 62,000 lbs. 4 axle — 87,000 lbs. 5+ axle — 104,800 lbs.

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 35, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

31-25-22

; P.L. 1983, ch. 213, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 147, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 85, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 22; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 22; P.L. 2022, ch. 178, § 1, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 179, § 1, effective June 27, 2022.

31-25-23.
Conditions and restrictions on excess load permits.

The department of transportation or local authority is authorized to issue or withhold a permit at its discretion, or if the permit is issued, to limit the number of trips, or to establish seasonal or other time limitations within which the described vehicles may be operated on the indicated highways, or otherwise to limit or prescribe conditions of operation of the vehicle or vehicles, when necessary to assure against undue damage to the road foundations, surfaces, or structures, and may require any undertaking or other security that may be deemed necessary to compensate for any injury to any roadway or road structure.

Whenever a permit is issued by the department of transportation or local authority for continuous operation, the permit shall not be issued for a period in excess of the registration date of the subject vehicle.

Upon re-registration of the subject vehicle, permits shall be issued by the department of transportation or local authority, upon the re-certification of the braking and carrying capacity of the subject vehicle as specified on the expired permit.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 35, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

31-25-23

; P.L. 1983, ch. 213, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 22; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 22; P.L. 2022, ch. 178, § 1, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 179, § 1, effective June 27, 2022.

31-25-24.
Carrying and inspection of permits.

Every permit, including all documentation required by that permit, issued under §§ 31-25- 21 —

31-25-23

shall be carried in the vehicle to which it refers and shall be open to inspection by any proper officer or authorized agent of any authority granting the permit. No person shall violate any of the terms or conditions of the special permit. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 35, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

31-25-24

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 122; P.L. 2022, ch. 178, § 1, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 179, § 1, effective June 27, 2022.

31-25-25.
Seasonal weight restrictions by local authorities.

Local authorities with respect to highways under their jurisdiction may by ordinance or resolution prohibit the operation of vehicles upon a highway or impose restrictions as to the weight of vehicles to be operated upon a highway, for a total period of not to exceed ninety (90) days in any one calendar year, whenever the highway by reason of deterioration, rain, snow, or other climatic conditions will be seriously damaged or destroyed unless the use of vehicles on it is prohibited or the permissible weights of them is reduced.

The local authority enacting the ordinance or resolution shall erect or cause to be erected and maintained signs designating the provisions of the ordinance or resolution at each end of that portion of any highway affected by it, and the ordinance or resolution shall not be effective unless and until the signs are erected and maintained.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 35, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

31-25-25

.

31-25-26.
Prohibition of commercial vehicles by local authorities.

Local authorities with respect to highways under their jurisdiction may, by ordinance or resolution, prohibit the operation of trucks or other commercial vehicles, or may impose limitations as to the weight of those vehicles on designated highways, which prohibitions and limitations shall be designated by appropriate signs placed on the highways. For the purposes of this section, a suburban vehicle, as defined in §

31-1-3

, shall not be deemed to be a truck or commercial vehicle.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 35, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

31-25-26

; P.L. 1964, ch. 214, § 2; P.L. 1966, ch. 128, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 6, § 19; P.L. 2005, ch. 410, § 17.